Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4779.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 20187. (1) Beginning 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a health facility or agency that provides a surgical procedure using heat-producing equipment that is likely to generate surgical smoke plume shall develop and implement a policy that requires the use of a surgical smoke plume evacuation system during a procedure described in this subsection. (2) As used in this section: (a) âSurgical procedure using heat-producing equipmentâ means any of the following: (i) A procedure that uses an electric current to cut, remove, or destroy tissue and control bleeding. (ii) A procedure using a laser. (iii) Any other procedure that uses heat-generating surgical instruments. (b) âSurgical smoke plumeâ means a vapor, gas, or harmful particle produced as a byproduct of a surgical procedure using heat-producing equipment. (c) âSurgical smoke plume evacuation systemâ means a dedicated device that is designed to capture, transport, filter, and neutralize surgical smoke plume at the site of origin and before surgical smoke plume can make ocular contact or contact with the respiratory tract of an individual. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor